Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1612
Propane, defined.

Propane means propane, butane, mixtures, and liquefied petroleum gas as defined by the National Fire Protection Association Standard 58 for the Storage and Handling of Liquefied Petroleum Gases the chemical composition of which is predominantly C3H8, whether recovered from natural gas or crude oil.

Laws 1998, LB 699, § 12.